Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-144
National Guard; officers; resignation.

Commissioned officers and warrant officers may resign in such manner and under such circumstances as may be prescribed by regulations of the United States Government.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 10, p. 659;

C.S.1929, § 55-115;

R.S.1943, § 55-123;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 42, p. 1595.